Louisiana, session 2026, SB260.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2798(B)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 9:2798(D)(4)
is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2798. Limitation of liability of a volunteer athletic coach, manager, team volunteer
health care healthcare provider, or official; definitions
* * *
B.(1) The provisions of this Section shall not be applicable unless the
volunteer athletic coach, manager, athletic trainer, team volunteer health care
healthcare provider, or sports team official has participated in a safety orientation
and training program established by the league or team with which he is affiliated
or a youth injury mitigation course. Any safety orientation and training program
established in compliance with this Subsection may include, as a condition of
satisfactory completion, a course in child cardiopulmonary resuscitation.
Participation in a safety orientation and training program by a coach, manager,
athletic trainer, team volunteer health care healthcare provider, or sports team
official may be waived by the league prior to the individual's or person's participation
in the sporting activities or in the practice thereof upon submission of appropriate
documented evidence as to that individual's or person's proficiency in first aid and
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 260 ENROLLED
safety, which may include a current certification in child cardiopulmonary
resuscitation.
* * *
D. For the purposes of this Section, the following phrases shall have the
meanings hereafter ascribed to them:
* * *
(4) "Youth injury mitigation course" means a course approved by the
Louisiana Department of Health that includes instruction in all of the following:
(a) Emergency preparedness and planning and rehearsal for responding
to traumatic injuries sustained during youth athletic activities.
(b) Concussions and head trauma.
(c) Heat and extreme weather-related injuries.
(d) Musculoskeletal overuse, physical conditioning, recovery, and
training equipment usage.
(e) Heart defects and abnormalities leading to sudden cardiac death.
Section 2. R.S. 40:1087.2 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1087.2. Youth injury mitigation courses; approval process
A. The Louisiana Department of Health shall establish and administer
a process for approving courses that meet the requirements of a youth injury
mitigation course.
B. Completion of an approved youth injury mitigation course may be
used to satisfy the requirements of a safety orientation and training program in
R.S. 9:2798. Each youth injury mitigation course shall include instruction on the
following:
(1) Emergency preparedness and planning and rehearsal for responding
to traumatic injuries sustained during youth athletic activities.
(2) Heat and extreme weather-related injuries.
(3) Musculoskeletal overuse, physical conditioning, recovery, and
training equipment usage.
(4) Heart defects and abnormalities leading to sudden cardiac death.
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 260 ENROLLED
C. Not later than one hundred eighty days after the effective date of this
Section, the department shall publish and maintain on its official website a list
of approved courses. The department shall annually review and update the list
of approved injury mitigation courses.
D. The department may adopt rules, in accordance with the
Administrative Procedure Act, as necessary to carry out the provisions of this
Section.
E. This Section shall not require the department to spend its funds to pay
for the development of the training courses provided in this Section. The
department may accept donated online courses, provided that the donated
courses are approved by the department.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
Section 4. This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Coach Safely Act".
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.